Washington statutes.
RCW 7.43.060

Dismissal of citizen complaint—Limitations.

(1) If the complaint under this chapter is filed by a citizen, the complaint shall not be dismissed by the citizen for want of prosecution except upon a sworn statement made by the citizen and the citizen's attorney, if the citizen has one. The statement shall set forth the reasons why the action should be dismissed. The case shall only be dismissed if so ordered by the court.

(2) In case of failure to prosecute the action with reasonable diligence, or at the request of the plaintiff, the court, in its discretion, may substitute any other citizen consenting to be substituted for the plaintiff.

[ 1988 c 141 s 9.]